en: Sea lettuce seaweeds, Sea lettuce
es: Algas lechuga de mar, Lechuga de mar
fr: Ulves
hr: Morska salata alge
la: Ulva
nl: Groenwieren

fr: Ao-nori
ja: 青のり

en: Dried sea lettuce seaweeds
es: Algas lechuga de mar deshidratadas
fr: Ulves sèches
hr: Sušena morska salata alge
nl: Gedroogde groenwieren

en: Sea lettuce seaweed powders, Ground dried sea lettuce seaweeds
es: Algas lechuga de mar en polvo, Algas lechuga de mar deshidratadas en polvo
hr: Morska salata u prahu od morskih algi
nl: Groenwierpoeders

en: Ulva lactuca seaweeds
es: Algas lamilla, Lamilla
fr: Laitue de mer
hr: Ulva lactuca morske alge
la: Ulva lactuca
nl: Zeesla

en: Dried ulva lactuca seaweeds
es: Algas lamilla deshidratadas
fr: Algues laitue de mer sèches
hr: Osušene alge ulva lactuca
nl: Gedroogde zeesla

en: Sea spaghetti seaweeds, Sea spaghetti, Thongweed, Sea thong
es: Algas espagueti de mar, Espagueti de mar
fr: Algues spaghetti de mer, Spaghetti de mer, Haricot de mer
hr: Morski špageti alge
la: Himanthalia elongata
nl: Riemwieren

en: Canned sea spaghetti seaweeds
es: Algas espagueti de mar en conserva
hr: Konzervirani morski špageti alge
nl: Riemwier in blik/pot

en: Dried sea spaghetti seaweeds
es: Algas espagueti de mar deshidratadas
fr: Algues spaghetti de mer sèches
hr: Sušeni morski špageti alge
nl: Gedroogde riemwieren

en: Sea spaghetti seaweed powders, Ground dried sea spaghetti seaweeds
es: Algas espagueti de mar en polvo, Algas espagueti de mar deshidratadas en polvo
hr: Morski špageti u prahu od morskih algi
nl: Riemwierpoeders

en: Wakame seaweeds, Wakame
de: Wakame
es: Algas wakame, Wakame
fr: Algues wakame, Wakame
hr: Wakame morske trave
ja: ワカメ, わかめ, 若布
la: Undaria pinnatifida
nl: Wakame

en: Dried Atlantic wakame, dehydrated Atlantic wakame, dehydrated Alaria esculenta, Dried Alaria esculenta
fr: Algues wakame de l'Atlantique

en: Canned wakame seaweeds
es: Algas wakame en conserva
hr: Konzervirane alge wakame
nl: Wakame in blik/pot

en: Dried wakame seaweeds
es: Algas wakame deshidratadas
fr: Algues wakame sèches
hr: Sušene alge wakame
nl: Gedroogde wakame

en: Wakame seaweed powders, Ground dried wakame seaweeds
es: Algas wakame en polvo
hr: Prah wakame morske trave
nl: Wakamepoeders

en: Seaweed products
de: Algenprodukte
es: Productos a base de algas
fi: merilevätuotteet
fr: Produits à base d'algues
hr: Proizvodi od morskih algi
it: Prodotti a base di alghe
nl: Producten op basis van algen

en: Agar-agar, Agar
bg: Агар-агар
de: Agar-Agar
es: Agar-agar, Agar
fr: Agar-agar, Agar
hr: Agar-agar
it: Agar-Agar
ja: 寒天
nl: Agar-agar, Agar

en: Agar-agar powder
fr: Agar agar en poudre
zh: 琼脂粉

en: Caviar substitutes, Artificial caviar, Imitation caviar
da: Kaviarerstatninger
fr: Substituts du caviar, Imitation de caviar
ru: Искусственная икра
sv: Kaviarersättningar
uk: Штучна ікра
zh: 仿鱼子酱

en: Plant-based caviar substitutes, Vegan caviar substitutes, Plant-based caviars, Vegan caviars
da: Plantebaserede kaviarer, Veganske kaviarer
fr: Caviars végétaux, Caviar végétal
sv: Växtbaserade kaviarer, Veganska kaviarer